District of Columbia statutes.
9-111.01b

Local Roads Construction and Maintenance Fund; dedicated revenue.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-184, § 102b
as added Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 622(b), 50 DCR 5668
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 9, 51 DCR 881
Oct 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 6022(b), 52 DCR 7503

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of § 9-111.01b, see § 622(b) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of § 9-111.01b, see § 2 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Act of 2003 Department of Transportation Funding Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-138, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6863).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 9-111.01b, see § 622(b) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 6022(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).